Maryland, session 2026, HB1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
11–504.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “DISABLED DISABILITY” MEANS HAVING A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL
DISABILITY THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1520*

HOUSE BILL 1520
(I) MAKES AN INDIVIDUAL UNABLE TO ENGAGE IN
SUBSTANTIAL GAINFUL EMPLOYMENT; AND
(II) 1. HAS LASTED OR CAN BE EXPECTED TO LAST AT LEAST
12 MONTHS; OR
2. CAN BE EXPECTED TO RESULT IN DEATH A PHYSICAL
OR MENTAL IMPAIRMENT THAT RESULTS IN A SUBSTANTIAL IMPEDIMENT TO
EMPLOYMENT.
(3) “DISABLED VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–208 OF
THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
[(2)] (4) (3) “Depository institution” means a bank, credit union, trust
company, savings bank, or savings and loan association, or any of their affiliates or
subsidiaries.
(5) (4) “ELDERLY” MEANS AT LEAST 60 YEARS OLD.
[(3)] (6) (5) “Value” means fair market value as of the date on which the
execution or other judicial process becomes effective against the property of the debtor, or
the date of filing the petition under the federal Bankruptcy Code.
(b) The following items are exempt from execution on a judgment:
(1) Wearing apparel, books, tools, instruments, or appliances, in an amount
not to exceed $5,000 in value necessary for the practice of any trade or profession except
those kept for sale, lease, or barter.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, money payable in
the event of sickness, accident, injury, or death of any person, including compensation for
loss of future earnings. This exemption includes but is not limited to money payable on
account of judgments, arbitrations, compromises, insurance, benefits, compensation, and
relief. Disability income benefits are not exempt if the judgment is for necessities contracted
for after the disability is incurred.
(3) Professionally prescribed health aids for the debtor or any dependent of
the debtor.
(4) (I) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE debtor’s interest, not to exceed [$1,000] $5,000 in value, in household
furnishings, household goods, wearing apparel, appliances, books, animals kept as pets,
and other items that are held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the
debtor or any dependent of the debtor.

HOUSE BILL 1520 3
(II) FOR A DISABLED VETERAN DEBTOR WHO IS ELDERLY OR
WHO HAS A DISABILITY, THE DEBTOR’S INTEREST, NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 IN
VALUE, IN HOUSEHOLD FURNISHINGS, HOUSEHOLD GOODS, WEARING APPAREL,
APPLIANCES, BOOKS, ANIMALS KEPT AS PETS, AND OTHER ITEMS THAT ARE HELD
PRIMARILY FOR THE PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD USE OF THE DEBTOR OR
ANY DEPENDENT OF THE DEBTOR.
(5) THE DEBTOR’S INTEREST, NOT TO EXCEED $3,000 IN VALUE, IN
FIREARMS.
(6) (I) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH AND SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE DEBTOR’S
INTEREST, NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 IN VALUE, IN ONE MOTOR VEHICLE NECESSARY
FOR PRACTICE OF THE DEBTOR’S OCCUPATION, TRADE, OR ENROLLMENT IN ANY
PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ELEMENTARY, SECONDARY, OR CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION SCHOOL OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
2. THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A MOTOR
VEHICLE USED TO COMMUTE TO AN OCCUPATION, A TRADE, OR AN EDUCATIONAL
PROGRAM THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE NECESSARY FOR USE IN THE COURSE OF THE
OCCUPATION, TRADE, OR EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM.
(II) FOR A DEBTOR WHO IS ELDERLY OR DISABLED WHO HAS A
DISABILITY, THE DEBTOR’S INTEREST, NOT TO EXCEED $25,000, IN ONE MOTOR
VEHICLE NECESSARY FOR THE PRACTICE OF THE DEBTOR’S OCCUPATION, TRADE,
OR ENROLLMENT IN ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ELEMENTARY, SECONDARY, OR
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION SCHOOL OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION.
[(5)] (7) Subject to subsection (c)(3) of this section, up to $500 in a deposit
account or other account of the debtor held by a depository institution, without election of
the debtor.
[(6)] (8) Cash or property of any kind equivalent in value to $6,000 is
exempt, if within 30 days from the date of the attachment or the levy by the sheriff, the
debtor elects to exempt cash or selected items of property in an amount not to exceed a
cumulative value of $6,000, except that the cumulative value of cash and property
exempted under this item and item [(5)] (7) of this subsection may not exceed $6,000.
[(7)] (9) Money payable or paid in accordance with an agreement or court
order for child support.

HOUSE BILL 1520
[(8)] (10) Money payable or paid in accordance with an agreement or court
order for alimony to the same extent that wages are exempt from attachment under §
15–601.1(b)(1)(i) of the Commercial Law Article.
[(9)] (11) The debtor’s beneficial interest in any trust property that is
immune from the claims of the debtor’s creditors under § 14.5–511 of the Estates and Trusts
Article.
[(10)] (12) With respect to claims by a separate creditor of a husband or
wife, trust property that is immune from the claims of the separate creditors of the husband
or wife under § 14.5–511 of the Estates and Trusts Article.
(13) PAYMENTS UNDER § 24 OR § 32 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE.
(c) (1) (i) In order to determine whether the property listed in subsection
(b)(4) and [(6)] (8) of this section is subject to execution, the sheriff shall appraise the
property at the time of levy.
(ii) The sheriff shall return the appraisal with the writ.
(iii) An appraisal made by the sheriff under this paragraph is subject
to review by the court on motion of the debtor.
(iv) Procedures will be as prescribed by rules issued by the Supreme
Court of Maryland.
(2) (i) A writ of garnishment issued for a deposit account or other
account held by a depository institution shall instruct the garnishee that, subject to
additional exemptions, it is to garnish only the amount exceeding the amount exempted
without election of the debtor.
(ii) A depository institution may not be liable to the judgment
creditor for actions taken in good faith reliance on the instructions in the writ of
garnishment required under this paragraph.
(3) (i) A depository institution shall, on receipt of a writ of garnishment
or other levy or attachment, answer the writ of garnishment or other levy or attachment
and, if the debtor maintains any deposit accounts with the depository institution, state:
1. That the total amount does not exceed $500; or
2. The amount of funds in excess of $500 that has been held
pending further order of court.

HOUSE BILL 1520 5
(ii) For any funds in excess of $500, the depository institution shall
follow all other customary procedures for handling a writ of garnishment or other levy or
attachment, including freezing of funds.
(iii) 1. If a debtor holds an interest in multiple deposit accounts
at a single depository institution, the depository institution may determine how and to
which account or accounts the $500 exemption should be applied.
2. This subparagraph does not create a cause of action
against a depository institution that complies with a writ of garnishment or other levy or
attachment.
(iv) The exemption under subsection [(b)(5)] (B)(7) of this section:
1. Applies separately to each depository institution and to
each writ of garnishment directed to a depository institution; and
2. Does not preclude or reduce a debtor’s rights to any other
exemption provided by State or federal law.
(d) The debtor may not waive, by cognovit note or otherwise, the provisions of
subsections (b) and (h) of this section.
(e) The exemptions in this section do not apply to wage attachments.
(f) (1) (i) In addition to the exemptions provided in subsection (b) of this
section, and in other statutes of this State, in any proceeding under Title 11 of the United
States Code, entitled “Bankruptcy”, any individual debtor domiciled in this State may
exempt the debtor’s aggregate interest in:
1. Personal property, up to $5,000; and
2. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph:
A. Owner–occupied residential real property, including a
condominium unit, A MOBILE HOME AS DEFINED IN § 8A–101 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE, or a manufactured home that has been converted to real property
in accordance with § 8B–201 of the Real Property Article; or
B. A cooperative housing corporation that owns property that
the debtor occupies as a residence.
(ii) 1. [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE exemption allowed under subparagraph (i)2 of this
paragraph may not exceed [the amount under 11 U.S.C. § 522(d)(1), adjusted in accordance

HOUSE BILL 1520
with 11 U.S.C. § 104, subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection]
$300,000 IN VALUE.
2. THE EXEMPTION ALLOWED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE $600,000 IN VALUE IF THE OWNER OR A
DEPENDENT OF THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY IS ELDERLY OR DISABLED.
(2) An individual may not claim the exemption under paragraph (1)(i)2 of
this subsection on a particular property if:
(i) The individual has claimed successfully the exemption on the
property within 8 years prior to the filing of the bankruptcy proceeding in which the
exemption under this subsection is claimed; or
(ii) The individual’s spouse, child, child’s spouse, parent, sibling,
grandparent, or grandchild has claimed successfully the exemption on the property within
8 years prior to the filing of the bankruptcy proceeding in which the exemption under this
subsection is claimed.
(3) The exemption under paragraph (1)(i)2 of this subsection may not be
claimed by both a husband and wife in the same bankruptcy proceeding.
(g) In any bankruptcy proceeding, a debtor is not entitled to the federal
exemptions provided by § 522(d) of the federal Bankruptcy Code.
(h) (1) In addition to the exemptions provided in subsections (b) and (f) of this
section and any other provisions of law, any money or other assets payable to a participant
or beneficiary from, or any interest of any participant or beneficiary in, a retirement plan
qualified under § 401(a), § 403(a), § 403(b), § 408, § 408A, § 414(d), or § 414(e) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or § 409 (as in effect prior to January
1984) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, shall be exempt
from any and all claims of the creditors of the beneficiary or participant, other than claims
by the Maryland Department of Health.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to:
(i) An alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as
defined in § 414(p) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(ii) A retirement plan, qualified under § 401(a) of the United States
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as a creditor of an individual retirement
account qualified under § 408 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended; or
(iii) The assets of a bankruptcy case filed before January 1, 1988.

HOUSE BILL 1520 7
(3) The interest of an alternate payee in a plan described under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall be exempt from any and all claims of any creditor of the alternate
payee, except claims by the Maryland Department of Health.
(4) If a contribution to a retirement plan described under paragraph (1) of
this subsection exceeds the amount deductible or, in the case of contribution under § 408A
of the Internal Revenue Code, the maximum contribution allowed under the applicable
provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the portion of
that contribution that exceeds the amount deductible or, in the case of contribution under
§ 408A of the Internal Revenue Code, the maximum contribution allowed, and any accrued
earnings on such a portion, are not exempt under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(i) (1) In this subsection, “net recovery” means the sum of money to be
distributed to the debtor after deduction of attorney’s fees, expenses, medical bills, and
satisfaction of any liens or subrogation claims arising out of the claims for personal injury,
including those arising under:
(i) The Medicare Secondary Payer Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395y;
(ii) A program of the Maryland Department of Health for which a
right of subrogation exists under §§ 15–120 and 15–121.1 of the Health – General Article;
(iii) An employee benefit plan subject to the federal Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;
(iv) A health insurance contract; or
(v) A workers’ compensation insurance plan.
(2) Twenty–five percent of the net recovery by the debtor is subject to
execution on a judgment for a child support arrearage on a claim for:
(i) Personal injury; or
(ii) Workers’ compensation indemnity benefits, including any weekly
benefits or settlement proceeds payable to the debtor.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.